Washington statutes.
RCW 21.20.435

Assurance of discontinuance of violations—Acceptance—Filing.

In the enforcement of this chapter, the director may accept an assurance of discontinuance of violations of the provisions of this chapter from any person deemed by the director to be in violation hereof. Any such assurance shall be in writing, may state that the person giving such assurance does not admit to any violation of this chapter, and shall be filed with and subject to the approval of the superior court of the county in which the alleged violator resides or has his or her principal place of business, or in Thurston county. Proof of failure to comply with the assurance of discontinuance shall be prima facie evidence of a violation of this chapter.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 68 s 31; 1974 ex.s. c 77 s 13.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1974 ex.s. c 77: See note following RCW 21.20.040.